Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202548-1127
Military or veteran status; inclusion in act; effect.

The inclusion of military or veteran status as a protected class in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act and sections 23-2525, 23-2531, and 23-2541:

(1) Is not intended to duplicate or mirror the protections offered by the federal Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.;

(2) Does not require an employer or other covered entity to treat a servicemember who is absent from work differently than an individual who is not a servicemember;

(3) Does not prohibit the granting of special benefits to veterans or servicemembers on an otherwise nondiscriminatory basis; and

(4) Does not prohibit veterans' preference programs.

Laws 2025, LB150, § 91.